Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

32-1-1.
Short title.

This title shall be known as the “Georgia Code of Public Transportation.”

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-1-2.
Purpose and legislative intent.

The purpose of this title is to provide a code of statutes for the public roads and other transportation facilities of the state, the counties, and municipalities of Georgia. The legislative intent is to provide an effective legal basis for the organization, administration, and operation of an efficient, modern system of public roads and other modes of transportation.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Abandon” means to close permanently to public travel or to relinquish jurisdiction of a preexisting public road by official action as required by Chapter 7 of this title, thereby foreclosing the duty of future maintenance on such preexisting public road.

“Board” means the State Transportation Board.

“Borrow pit” means land from which dirt, gravel, rock, or related material will be excavated and used for a public road purpose. Such land need not be immediately adjacent or contiguous to the road or project under construction, repair, or reconstruction.

“Bridge” means a structure, including the approaches thereto, erected in order:

To afford unrestricted vehicular passage over any obstruction in any public road, including, but not limited to, rivers, streams, ponds, lakes, bays, ravines, gullies, railroads, public highways, and canals; or

To afford unrestricted vehicular passage under or over existing railroads and public roads.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation.

“Construction” means the planning, location, surveying, designing, supervising, inspecting, and actual building of a new road; or the paving, striping, restriping, modifying for safety purposes, grading, widening, relocation, reconstruction, or other major improvement of a substantial portion of an existing public road together with all activities incident to any of the foregoing.

“County” means either one of the several counties, any division, department, agency, authority, instrumentality, or branch thereof, or the county governing authority, that is, the judge of the probate court, board of county commissioners, county commissioner, or other county officers in charge of the roads, bridges, and revenues of the county.

“Dedication” means the donation by the owner, either expressly or impliedly, and acceptance by the public of property for public road purposes, in accordance with statutory or common-law provisions.

“Department” means the Department of Transportation.

“Federal-aid systems” means those public roads in Georgia comprised of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways and the National Highway System, as those terms are defined in Section 103 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

“Grade crossing” means a crossing at grade of a public road intersecting a track or tracks of a railroad.

“Grade separation structure” means an underpass or overpass as defined in this Code section.

(12.1)

“Interstate highways” means any highway which constitutes a part of The Dwight D. Eisenhower System of Interstate and Defense Highways as used in Section 103 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

“Let” means to award a contract to one of several persons who have submitted competitive bids therefor in response to advertisement.

“Limited-access road” means a public highway, road, or street for through traffic, over, from, or to which owners or occupants of abutting land or other persons have no right or easement or only a limited right or easement of access, light, view, or air by reason of the fact that their property abuts upon such limited-access highway, road, or street or for any other reason.

“Maintenance” means the preservation of a public road, including repairs and resurfacing not amounting to construction as defined in this Code section.

“Municipality” means an incorporated city, the governing body of which holds at least six regular meetings each year and which for a period of one year has levied and collected an ad valorem tax on the real property in such city or has for a one-year period performed at least two of the following municipal activities and services:

Furnished water service;

Furnished sewage service;

Furnished garbage collection;

Furnished police protection;

Furnished fire protection;

Assessed and collected business licenses;

Furnished street lighting facilities.

The term may also refer to any division, department, agency, authority, instrumentality, or branch of a municipality. Where the context requires or otherwise indicates, the term “municipality” may also mean the municipal governing authority, that is, the mayor and council, board of aldermen, board of commissioners, or other chief legislative body of a municipality.

“Negotiated contract” means a contract made without formal advertising for competitive bids.

“Other transportation purposes” or “other public transportation purposes” means any transportation facility designed to transport people or goods, including but not limited to railroads, port and harbor facilities, air transport and airport facilities, mass transportation facilities, as defined in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 32-9-1, transportation projects, as defined by subsection (h) of Section 2 of an Act approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended, and transportation enhancement activities, as defined in Section 101 of Title 23 of the United States Code, as amended by Public Law 102-240 as it existed on January 1, 1993. However, in no event and for no purpose shall the term “other transportation purposes” or “other public transportation purposes” be deemed to include coal slurry pipelines.

“Overpass” means a bridge, including the approaches thereto and all appurtenances thereof, for carrying public road traffic over a railroad or another public road or for providing pedestrian walkways over a public road.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or private organization of any character.

“Private road” means a privately owned road or way, including any bridge thereon, which is only open for the benefit of one or more individuals and not for the general public. This term also means a road which lies on privately owned land.

“Proposal guaranty” means acceptable surety furnished by a bidder as a guaranty that he will enter into a contract and will furnish contract performance and payment bonds if a contract is awarded to him.

“Protective devices” means gates, flashing light signals, and similar devices or combinations thereof, together with necessary appurtenances, to be installed or in operation at any grade crossing and which comply with the safety standards determined by the department as being adequate at that time for the protection of traffic.

“Public road” means a highway, road, street, avenue, toll road, tollway, drive, detour, or other way that either is open to the public or has been acquired as right of way, and is intended to be used for enjoyment by the public and for the passage of vehicles in any county or municipality of Georgia, including but not limited to the following public rights, structures, sidewalks, facilities, and appurtenances incidental to the construction, maintenance, and enjoyment of such rights of way:

Surface, shoulders, and sides;

Bridges;

Causeways;

Viaducts;

Ferries;

Overpasses;

Underpasses;

Railroad grade crossings;

Tunnels;

Signs, signals, markings, or other traffic control devices;

Buildings for public equipment and personnel used for or engaged in administration, construction, or maintenance of such ways or research pertaining thereto;

Wayside parks;

Parking facilities;

Drainage ditches;

Canals and culverts;

Rest areas;

Truck-weighing stations or check points; and

Scenic easements and easements of light, air, view, and access.

“Right of way” means, generally, property or any interest therein, whether or not in the form of a strip, which is acquired for or devoted to a public road.

“Scenic easement” means a servitude devised to permit land to remain in private ownership for its normal agricultural, residential, or other use consistent with public road purposes but at the same time placing a control over the future uses of the area to maintain its scenic, landscape, sightly, or safety values for the public road which the land adjoins.

“State agency” means any division, department, instrumentality, branch, or other body of the state to which state governmental functions have been delegated.

(27.1)

“State roads” or “state routes” means those roads which are defined under paragraph (1) of Code Section 32-4-1.

“Subcontract” means a contract by which one agrees with a party to another contract to perform all or a part of such other contract.

“Underpass” means a bridge, including the approaches thereto and all appurtenances thereof, which provides access for a public road underneath a railroad or another public road or for a pedestrian walkway underneath a public road.

“Utility” means any publicly, privately, or cooperatively owned line, facility, or system for producing, transmitting, or distributing communications, power, electricity, light, heat, gas, oil products, water, steam, clay, waste, storm water not connected with highway drainage, and other similar services and commodities, including publicly owned fire and police signals and street lighting systems, which directly or indirectly serve the public. This term also means a person, municipal corporation, county, state agency, or public authority which owns or manages a utility as defined in this paragraph.

“Vehicle” means a device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public road.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 775, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 267, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 973, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 590, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 23; Ga. L. 1993, p. 914, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 136, § 32; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 1/SB 160; Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 1/HB 137.

Law reviews.

For survey article on construction law for the period from June 1, 2002 through May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 85 (2003).

For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

32-1-4.
Institution and prosecution of criminal proceedings relating to criminal acts against department’s property.

As used in this Code section, the term “property of the department” means any property, whether real or personal, which is owned by or in which there is an interest held by the department.

Whenever it may appear to the commissioner that any person or corporation has committed, is committing, has attempted to commit, or is attempting to commit any act which is prohibited by the criminal laws of this state against, or involving in any manner whatsoever, property of the department, he may, in his discretion, transmit such evidence as may be available concerning such act to the Attorney General or to the appropriate prosecuting attorney who may, in his discretion, institute and prosecute the necessary criminal proceedings.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 590, § 1.

32-1-5.
Powers and duties of Attorney General under Code Section 32-1-4.

In carrying out the duties imposed by Code Section 32-1-4, the Attorney General is vested, in addition to and cumulative of the rights, powers, and duties otherwise appertaining to his office, with all of the rights, powers, duties, privileges, obligations, and immunities held by or inuring to any prosecuting attorney.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 590, § 2.

Cross references.

District attorneys, T. 15, C. 18.

Attorney General, T. 45, C. 15.

32-1-6.
Effect of Code Sections 32-1-4 and 32-1-5 on other laws.

Nothing in Code Sections 32-1-4 and 32-1-5 shall limit any statutory or common-law right of the state to punish any person or corporation for the violation of any provision of any law.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 590, § 3.

32-1-7.
[Reserved] Disbursement of fines and forfeitures.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 2-1, effective July, 1, 2001.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, § 2-1, provided for the repeal of this Code section. Section 13-1 of that Act, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act becomes fully effective July 1, 2001, but authorizes certain administrative action commencing April 28, 2000, for purposes of appointing certain officials, adopting rules and regulations, employing personnel, and preparing for and phasing in full implementation; provided, however, that the Governor may by executive order extend the date for full implementation of the Act to no later than July 1, 2003. In accordance with an executive order issued June 29, 2001, by the Governor, the repeal of this Code section by Ga. L. 2000, p. 951, became fully effective July 1, 2001.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1236, § 1.

32-1-8.
Construction and maintenance of private roads.

It shall be unlawful for any official, officer, or employee of the department, the State Road and Tollway Authority, the Georgia Highway Authority, or any similar authority or of any county or municipality to authorize the construction or maintenance of any private road.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1102, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1.

Cross references.

Georgia Highway Authority, §

32-10-1

et seq.

State Road and Tollway Authority, §

32-10-60

et seq.

Conflicts of interest, § 45-10-20 et seq.

32-1-9.
Enforcement of title by law enforcement officers.

It shall be the duty of all state and local law enforcement officers to enforce any provision of this title which states that any act or omission is unlawful.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1103, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-1-10.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this title for which no specific penalty is provided, whether or not such act or omission is expressly declared elsewhere in this title to be unlawful, or who violates any of the rules and regulations issued under authority of and in accord with the provisions of this title shall be guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, however, that a violation of Code Sections 32-6-26 and 32-6-27 shall not be considered a crime.

In addition to the penalty provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, the department shall have the right to enjoin any act or omission so punishable as a misdemeanor or punished otherwise as provided elsewhere in this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-1101, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1989, § 4.

32-1-11.
Construction of title.

This title shall be construed liberally to effectuate its purposes.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-103, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.